Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.020

Chief executive officers—Appointment.

There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the director of enterprise services, (9) the director of commerce, (10) the director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15) the director of financial institutions, (16) the director of the department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the secretary of children, youth, and families, and (18) the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership.

Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 110; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 108; 2009 c 565 s 26; 2007 c 341 s 47; 2006 c 265 s 112. Prior: 2005 c 333 s 11; 2005 c 319 s 2; 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 (Referendum Bill No. 45, approved November 7, 1995); prior: 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 17; 1993 c 472 s 18; 1993 c 280 s 19; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 811; 1987 c 506 s 3; 1985 c 466 s 48; 1984 c 125 s 13; 1981 c 136 s 62; 1979 c 10 s 2; prior: 1977 ex.s. c 334 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 21; 1977 c 7 s 2; prior: 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115 s 20; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 25; 1971 c 11 s 2; prior: 1970 ex.s. c 62 s 29; 1970 ex.s. c 18 s 51; 1969 c 32 s 2; prior: 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 13; 1967 c 242 s 13; 1965 c 156 s 21; 1965 c 8 s 43.17.020; prior: 1957 c 215 s 20; 1955 c 285 s 3; 1953 c 174 s 2; prior: (i) 1935 c 176 s 2; 1933 c 3 s 2; 1929 c 115 s 2; 1921 c 7 s 3; RRS s 10761. (ii) 1937 c 111 s 1, part; RRS s 10760. (iii) 1945 c 267 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10459-1, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2007 c 341: See RCW 90.71.907.

Effective date—2006 c 265: See RCW 43.216.902.

Findings—Intent—2005 c 319: "The legislature finds that it is in the interest of the state to restructure the roles and responsibilities of the state's transportation agencies in order to improve efficiency and accountability. The legislature also finds that continued citizen oversight of the state's transportation system remains an important priority. To achieve these purposes, the legislature intends to provide direct accountability of the department of transportation to the governor, in his or her role as chief executive officer of state government, by making the secretary of transportation a cabinet-level official. Additionally, it is essential to clearly delineate between the separate and distinct roles and responsibilities of the executive and legislative branches of government. The role of executive is to oversee the implementation of transportation programs, while the legislature reserves to itself the role of policymaking. Finally, consolidating public outreach and auditing of the state's transportation agencies under a single citizen-governed entity, the transportation commission, will provide the public with information about the performance of the transportation system and an avenue for direct participation in its oversight." [ 2005 c 319 s 1.]

Part headings—2005 c 319: "Part headings used in this act are no part of the law." [ 2005 c 319 s 142.]

Effective dates—2005 c 319: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2005, except for section 103 of this act which takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 319 s 145.]

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 2: "Sections 2 through 43 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1996." [ 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 45.]

Referral to electorate—1995 1st sp.s. c 2: See note following RCW 77.04.013.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 2 ss 1-6, 8-59, and 61-79: See RCW 43.300.900.

Effective date—1993 c 472: See RCW 43.320.900.

Effective date—1993 c 280: See RCW 43.330.902.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Legislative findings and intent—1987 c 506: See note following RCW 77.04.020.

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 334: See note following RCW 46.01.011.

Federal requirements—1977 ex.s. c 151: See RCW 47.98.070.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105: See note following RCW 41.04.270.

Effective date—Severability—1970 ex.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 43.20A.010.